Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.24.050

Call report.

(1) A state trust company shall file no later than forty-five days after the end of each calendar quarter a statement of its financial condition and a summary of the condition of its fiduciary accounts, known as a call report, in a form and content as prescribed by the director by rule or written policy from which at least ninety days' advance written notice has been given.

(2) Unless otherwise established by rule, such call report shall be deemed confidential examination information and shall be subject to RCW 30A.04.075.

[ 2019 c 389 s 45.]